Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.655

Tabulation of invalid ballots.

Any election officer who intentionally tabulates or causes to be tabulated, through any act or omission, an invalid ballot when the person has actual knowledge that the ballot is invalid, is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2011 c 10 s 75; 2003 c 111 s 2132. Prior: 1991 c 81 s 14; 1965 c 9 s 29.85.220; prior: 1911 c 89 s 1, part; Code 1881 s 911; 1873 p 205 s 108; RRS s 5385. Formerly RCW 29.85.220.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.